Maryland, session 2026, HB1062.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Estates and Trusts
13–204.
(a) (1) If a basis exists as described in § 13–201 of this subtitle for assuming
jurisdiction over the property of a minor or disabled person, the circuit court, without
appointing a guardian, may authorize or direct a transaction with respect to the property,
service, or care arrangement of the minor or disabled person.
(2) The transactions described under paragraph (1) of this subsection
include:
(i) Payment, delivery, deposit, or retention of funds or property;
(ii) Sale, mortgage, lease, or other transfer of property;
(iii) Purchase of contracts for an annuity, life care, training, or
education;
(iv) Making the election to take an elective share of an estate subject
to election under § 3–403 of this article; [or]
(V) GRANTING ACCESS TO FINANCIAL RECORDS;
– 1 –

Ch. 433 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(VI) ESTABLISHING ELIGIBILITY FOR GOVERNMENT
ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS; OR
[(v)] (VII) Any other transaction described in:
1. § 13–203(c)(2) of this subtitle;
2. Title 9, Subtitle 2 of this article; or
3. § 15–102 of this article.
(b) Before approving a transaction or arrangement under this section, the court
shall consider the interests of creditors and dependents of the minor or disabled person and
whether the property of the minor or disabled person needs the continuing protection
provided by a guardian.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 2 –